Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.403

Property and casualty insurance statements of actuarial opinion.

Documents, materials, and information obtained by the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.05.385(2) are confidential and privileged and not subject to public disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 25 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—2006 c 25 ss 1-3: See note following RCW 48.05.383.

Effective date—2006 c 25 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 48.05.383.